District of Columbia statutes.
2-105

Certificate of inspection required.

No person shall use or cause to be used any steam boiler operating at a pressure in excess of 15 pounds per square inch, or operating at a pressure less than 15 pounds per square inch unless provided with an unassisted gravity return, or any unfired pressure vessel operating at a pressure in excess of 60 pounds per square inch and having a capacity in excess of 15 gallons, except such vessels as may be exempted by the Council of the District of Columbia, without having first obtained a certificate of inspection from the Boiler Inspector.

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1917, ch. 802, § 4

History

This section is referenced in § 2-106 and § 2-108.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-1005.
1973 Ed., § 1-705.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(23) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government